Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5212
Postgraduate residency training program; University of Nebraska Medical Center and Creighton University Medical Center; develop plans.

The University of Nebraska Medical Center and the Creighton University Medical Center shall each develop a separate plan to increase the number of graduates from its medical center who enter a primary care postgraduate residency training program. Each report shall include numerical goals and timeframes for such increases. Each medical center shall request input from the Nebraska Rural Health Advisory Commission in the formation of the plans.

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 71;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 44.